Washington statutes.
RCW 16.70.060

Concurrent powers—Cooperation between officials.

The powers conferred on the secretary by this chapter shall be concurrent with the powers conferred on the director of the department of agriculture by chapter 16.36 RCW, and chapter 43.23 RCW, and the secretary and director shall cooperate in exercising their responsibilities in these areas.

[ 1971 c 72 s 6.]